New York, session 2025-2026, S3098.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Legislative findings. The twenty-first century has seen an 2 increasing reliance upon social media as a source of news and informa- 3 tion. Social media platforms allow third-party users to post content on 4 an unlimited number of issues, and, unfortunately, though not solely 5 designed or intended for such use, more and more people have come to 6 rely on these third-party postings as their main source of news. Some 7 social media platforms have recently taken it upon themselves to act as 8 arbiters of truth, and have even gone so far as to block access to the 9 President of the United States. Given the expanding use of, and reliance 10 on, these social media platforms as a source of news, it is imperative 11 that use of such platforms be open and maintained for all people to 12 ensure that no perspective or piece of information is barred or blocked 13 from view by the public at large who has come to rely on such platforms 14 for information. 15 § 2. Legislative task force on internet media freedom. A legislative 16 task force on internet media freedom is hereby established to study the 17 practices and policies of social media companies that allow the posting 18 of third-party content by users, as well as other issues relating to 19 dissemination of such content, including but not limited to, forms of 20 censorship employed by social media companies. The task force will also 21 examine the impact social media has on elections, including the ability 22 of candidates and political parties to access and use the platform and 23 the use of censorship to unfairly benefit one candidate over another. 24 § 3. Composition. (a) The task force shall consist of eight members to 25 be appointed as follows: two members appointed by the speaker of the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06961-01-5 S. 3098 2 1 Assembly, two members appointed by the temporary president of the 2 Senate, two members appointed by the minority leader of the Assembly, 3 and two members appointed by the minority leader of the Senate. All 4 appointments made by legislative leaders to the task force shall, to the 5 extent practicable, have backgrounds in news publishing, including 6 online media publishing, and/or the study of law. 7 (b) Members of the task force shall serve without compensation. 8 (c) The members of the task force shall elect, by a majority vote, one 9 of its appointed members to serve as a chair. 10 § 4. Organization. (a) The task force shall meet for the first time on 11 May 1, 2025, at which time they shall elect a member to serve as a chair 12 of the task force pursuant to subdivision (c) of section three of this 13 act. 14 (b) The first meeting of the task force shall be held in the State 15 Capitol, in offices made available to it by the Legislature. The 16 location of subsequent meetings shall be at the discretion of the chair 17 of the task force. 18 (c) The task force shall create and maintain a website that provides 19 access to written submissions received by it, as well as means by which 20 individuals can submit testimony and view live and archived meetings and 21 hearings of the task force. 22 § 5. Hearings. The task force shall be authorized to hold public hear- 23 ings and meetings, and to consult with any organization, educational 24 institution, or other government entity or person, to enable it to 25 accomplish its duties. The task force shall hold at least two public 26 hearings for the purpose of soliciting public comment. 27 § 6. Duties and powers. (a) To effectuate the purposes of this act, 28 the task force may request and shall receive from any department, divi- 29 sion, board, bureau, commission or other agency of the state or any 30 state public authority such assistance, information and data as will 31 enable the task force to properly carry out its powers and duties. 32 (b) The task force may hire any necessary staff to assist in the 33 discharge of its duties, and may utilize funds appropriated to it for 34 necessary expenses related to the discharge of its duties. 35 (c) The task force shall undertake an examination of existing state 36 and federal policies relating to publishing third-party content on the 37 internet, including, but not limited to: 38 (i) use of social media platforms, including, but not limited to, who 39 uses them, for what purposes are they used, and a review of usage in 40 past political campaigns; 41 (ii) safeguards that exist to ensure accuracy of information posted 42 online; 43 (iii) use of censorship to restrict publication of third-party created 44 content online; 45 (iv) statutory protections that currently exist to ensure access to 46 social media platforms; and 47 (v) liability shields that protect platform operators. 48 § 7. Report. The task force shall draft a final report detailing its 49 findings, as well as any recommendations it has on changes to state or 50 federal law, and to executive agency policies, actions, and procedures 51 relating to the use of and access to social media. Such report shall be 52 completed and delivered to the Governor, the speaker of the Assembly, 53 the temporary president of the Senate, the minority leader of the Assem- 54 bly, the minority leader of the Senate, and each member of the New York 55 State Congressional Delegation on or before December 31, 2026. The S. 3098 3 1 report shall also be made publicly available and posted on the websites 2 of the State Assembly and Senate. 3 § 8. Dissolution. Upon completion of a final report and delivery as 4 directed by this act, the legislative task force shall be dissolved; 5 provided, however, that dissolution of this task force shall occur on or 6 before January 1, 2027. 7 § 9. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 8 deemed repealed January 1, 2027.